Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202083-153
Money or personal property to credit of inmate or patient; claim; time for presentment.

Any claim to money or personal property in the hands of the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Correctional Services, or the Department of Veterans' Affairs to the credit of an inmate or patient of any institution subject to the jurisdiction of such departments shall be required to be asserted within two years from and after either (1) the date of the death of the inmate or patient, while confined in such institution, or (2) the date of the discharge of the inmate or patient from such institution. If such claim is not presented within the time limited by this section, it shall be forever barred.

Laws 1953, c. 352, § 1, p. 1128;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 34;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 916;

Laws 2018, LB827, § 4.